Louisiana, session 2026, SB462.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 46:285(A), 285(A)(2) and (6), (C), (H),
and (I) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§285. Required training for child protection and foster care workers
A. No Each employee of the Department of Children and Family Services,
office of children and family services, with direct responsibility for cases dealing
with families and children after January 1, 1984, shall exercise responsibility for any
cases until that employee has completed shall complete a training program
consisting of at least thirty-two hours of instruction, addressing such appropriate
topics such as:
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1433 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 462
* * *
(2) Legal aspects of child protection and foster care including the legal duties
of the representatives, which may consist of various methods of informing such
representatives of such duties, in order to protect the constitutional and statutory
rights and safety of children and families from the initial time of contact during
investigation through treatment.
* * *
(6) Training to ensure that workers are knowledgeable in best practices for
promoting collaboration with families and that they are fully aware of the extent and
the limits of their legal authority and the legal rights of parents in carrying out such
investigations. Training shall include legal duties of workers to protect the
constitutional and statutory rights of children and families from the initial time of
contact during investigation through treatment.
* * *
C. Any employee hired on or after July 1, 2010, who has graduated from a
Council on Social Work Education accredited program of social work certifying that
the employee has completed course work and demonstrated competency in the core
areas of effective child welfare practice, including successful completion of a child
welfare specific internship, shall be deemed may be considered to have met the
thirty-two hour training requirement specified in Subsection A of this Section and
may begin exercising responsibility for cases under agency supervision. The
Department of Children and Family Services in partnership with the Louisiana
University Child Welfare Workforce Alliance shall define the core competencies,
which shall include but not be limited to the competencies set forth in Subsection A
of this Section, of effective child welfare practice. The Department of Children and
Family Services shall be specifically authorized to promulgate rules and regulations,
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, which may be necessary to effect the
provisions of this Section.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1433 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 462
H. The Department of Children and Family Services shall provide such
training through its own personnel, partnerships with universities, or by contracting
with qualified outside persons or agencies.
I. The Department of Children and Family Services may continue incentive
pay schedules established by the Department of State Civil Service to compensate
social work personnel with selected graduate degrees at a higher rate than other
persons without such specialized advanced degrees as provided by the Department
of State Civil Service and the State Civil Service Commission.
* * *
Section 2. The introductory paragraph of Children's Code Art. 610(A)(1), the
introductory paragraph of Children's Code Art. 610(A)(2), and Children's Code Art.
610(A)(4)(a), (C), and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. A reporter shall immediately report suspected child abuse or neglect or
that child abuse or neglect was a contributing factor in a child's death in the
following ways:
(1) To the Department of Children and Family Services if the reporter has
reason to believe that the perpetrator is any of the following:
* * *
(2) To a local or state law enforcement agency if the reporter has reason to
believe that the perpetrator is any of the following:
* * *
(4) Reports to the department shall be made as follows:
(a) A mandatory reporter shall make a report of suspected abuse or neglect
requiring immediate assistance via the designated state child protection reporting
hotline telephone number. A report of suspected abuse or neglect which is of a
nonemergency nature may be reported via the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Mandated Reporter Portal online. Reports may also be made in
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1433 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 462
person at any child welfare office.
* * *
C. The report shall also name the person or persons who are thought to have
caused or contributed to the child's condition, if known, and the report shall contain
the name of such the person if he is named by the child.
D. If the initial report was in oral form by a mandatory reporter, it shall be
followed by the mandatory reporter shall not be required to submit a written
report made within five days via the online Mandated Reporter Portal of the
department or by mail to the centralized intake unit of the department at the address
provided on the website of the department; or, if necessary, to the local law
enforcement agency. The reporter may use a form for the written report, which shall
be developed, approved, and made available by the Department of Children and
Family Services. The form is optional and may be available electronically on the
department's website.
* * *